data/lexd/60-adverbs.lexd
LEXICON Adverbs
abbai<Adv>:abbai
ainawārst<Adv>:ainawārst
ainawīdai<Adv>:ainawīdai
ainawīdan<Adv>:ainawīdan
ankstāinai<Adv>:ankstāinai
arwi<Adv>:arwi
arwiskai<Adv>:arwiskai
būtewingi<Adv>:būtewingi
deiwūtiskai<Adv>:deiwūtiskai
ilgai<Adv>:ilgai
kadden<Adv>:kadden
kadeznimai<Adv>:kadeznimai
kalsīwingiskai<Adv>:kalsīwingiskai
labbai<Adv>:labbai
lāimiskai<Adv>:lāimiskai
līgu<Adv>:līgu
mazzan<Adv>:mazzan
mazīngi<Adv>:mazīngi
miksiskai<Adv>:miksiskai
pastippan<Adv>:pastippan
prūsiskai<Adv>:prūsiskai
rānkiskai<Adv>:rānkiskai
spārtai<Adv>:spārtai
stalīwingi<Adv>:stalīwingi
stawīdiskai<Adv>:stawīdiskai
subbawīngi<Adv>:subbawīngi
tāli<Adv>:tāli
wārai<Adv>:wārai
wēlai<Adv>:wēlai
wūnzai<Adv>:wūnzai
āumeningi<Adv>:āumeningi
ēst<Adv>:ēst
šan<Adv>:šan
šandau<Adv>:šandau
šlūzingiskai<Adv>:šlūzingiskai
